California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(D) The “no exposure certification” (NEC) identification number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b) Prior to the issuance or renewal of the business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, the city shall determine whether any of the primary Standard Industrial Classification Codes are applicable to a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding Construction
 Activities, as referenced in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, and if applicable, the city shall confirm that the WDID, WDID application number, NONA, or NEC corresponds to the business requesting the initial business license or business license renewal. To determine whether any of the primary Standard Industrial Classification Codes are applicable to a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding Construction Activities, as referenced in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, the city may use information provided by the State Water Resources Control Board, including information posted pursuant to Section 13383.10 of the Water Code for these purposes. To confirm the WDID, WDID application number, NONA, or NEC, the city shall only need to keep record of the applicable documentation.

(c) The city shall transfer compliance information received in subdivision (a) to the State Water Resources Control Board as requested by the board. The city shall make the identification number provided in the applicable documentation available to the public upon request in a manner consistent with the procedures of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) For business license, equivalent instrument, or permit renewals, a city may develop a provisional license procedure that provides businesses three months to comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) “City” includes a charter city and a charter city and county.

(f) This
 section shall apply to applications for initial business licenses, equivalent instruments, or permits, and renewals thereof, submitted on and after January 1, 2020.

(g) This section shall not apply to a city that does not issue or renew, or have an application process for issuing or renewing, business licenses, equivalent instruments, or permits that include a business license.

(h) This section shall not be construed to impose any additional liability on a city under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit program for nonenrollment under a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding Construction Activities by a person who conducts a business operation that is a regulated industry, as defined in Section
 13383.5 of the Water Code. 

(i) For purposes of this section, a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit includes a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit issued solely for the purpose of raising revenue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 678, Sec. 1.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.5.

Notwithstanding Section 16000, no incorporated city shall require a regulatory license or impose a regulatory license fee with respect to cafe musicians.

“Cafe musician,” for the purposes of this section, means any person playing a musical instrument in any place or establishment where food or alcoholic beverages are sold, offered for sale or given away, who is an employee, or independent contractor, of such place or establishment. “Cafe musician” does not include an owner, manager, or operator of such place or establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.7.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the prohibition on the imposition of regulatory licenses and license fees on federally chartered veterans’ organizations that solicit donations as specified in this section is in need of uniform statewide regulation and constitutes a matter of statewide concern that shall be governed solely by this section.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 37101 of the Government Code, Section 16000 of this code, or any other provision of law, no city, including a charter city, shall require a regulatory license or impose a regulatory license fee with respect to the solicitation of donations for the support of veterans by federally chartered veterans’ organizations specified in Title 36 of the United States Code.

(c) This section shall not be construed to prohibit licensing and regulation of business-related activities, such as those involving the sale or exchange of goods or services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 138, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

Every honorably discharged or honorably relieved soldier, sailor, or marine of the United States or Confederate States who served in the Civil War, any Indian war, the Spanish-American War, any Philippine insurrection, the Chinese Relief Expedition, the World War of 1914 and years following, or World War II, who is physically unable to obtain a livelihood by manual labor, and who is a voter of this state, may distribute circulars, and hawk, peddle, and vend any goods, wares or merchandise owned by him, except spirituous, malt, vinous, or other intoxicating liquor, without payment of any license tax or fee whatsoever, whether municipal, county or state, and the legislative body shall issue to such soldier, sailor or marine, without cost, a license therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.5.

Every person who was honorably discharged or honorably relieved from the military, naval or air service of the United States who served on or after June 27, 1950, and prior to February 1, 1955, or on or after August 5, 1964, and prior to a future date to be established by the Legislature, who is physically unable to obtain a livelihood by manual labor, and who is a resident of this state, may distribute circulars, and hawk, peddle, and vend any goods, wares or merchandise owned by him, except spirituous, malt, or vinous, or other intoxicating liquor, without payment of any license tax or fee whatsoever, whether municipal, county or state, and the legislative body shall issue to such person, without cost, a license therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.7.

Every person who is honorably discharged or honorably relieved from the military, naval, or air service of the United States and who is a resident of this state, may distribute circulars, and hawk, peddle and vend any goods, wares, or merchandise owned by him or her, except spiritous, malt, or vinous, or other intoxicating liquor, without payment of any business license fee, whether municipal, county, or state, and the legislative body shall issue to that person, without cost, a license therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.8.

(a) A veteran who is honorably discharged or honorably relieved from the Armed Forces of the United States and is a resident of this state shall not be required to pay any local business license fees for a business selling or providing services if the veteran is the sole proprietor of the business.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the prohibition on the imposition of local business license fees on veterans as specified in
 this section is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

No license fee may be collected from, nor any penalty for the nonpayment thereof enforced against, any commercial traveler whose business is limited to goods, wares, and merchandise sold or dealt in at wholesale in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.1.

No license fee for the privilege of auctioning real estate may be collected from any real estate auctioneer, whose business is limited exclusively to auctioning real estate, except by the city in which he has a permanent place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.2.

No city shall impose a license fee or tax, other than a fee or tax based on gross receipts, for the privilege of renting, leasing, or operating laundry equipment, whether or not coin operated, upon any individual or firm whose business is limited exclusively to renting, leasing, or operating such equipment, which license fee taxes or has the effect of taxing any gross receipts, other than gross receipts actually derived from the conduct of business within such city. For purposes of this section, the tax shall be based on the entire gross receipts of the taxpayer derived within the city, and no minimum tax shall be imposed upon any business location, nor shall such tax be measured by the number of business locations or machines of the taxpayer within the city.

This section shall not apply to coin-operated laundry equipment owned and operated by a retail establishment providing coin-operated laundry equipment for general public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1145.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.5.

No city shall impose a license fee or tax, other than a fee or tax based on gross receipts, for the privilege of renting, leasing, or operating coin-operated vending machines, upon any individual or firm whose business is limited exclusively to renting, leasing, or operating such machines, which license fee or tax has the effect of taxing any gross receipts other than gross receipts which are directly attributable to the business activities conducted within the city. For the purposes of this section, the license fee or tax shall be based on the entire gross receipts which are directly attributable to the business activities conducted within the city, and no minimum license fee or tax shall be imposed upon any business location, nor shall such license fee or tax be measured by the number of business locations or machines of the taxpayer within the city.

Any license to conduct a business issued by a city in connection with which the city imposes a license fee or tax upon coin-operated vending machines within the city, may be revoked for failure of the licensee to report to the city the gross receipts from such machines. The city may demand an audit of any such licensee and require him to submit a copy of the state sales and use tax returns filed relative to such machines, and a copy of any other tax statement filed with any government entity by him or by any other individual or firm owning, renting, leasing, or operating such machines disclosing the gross receipts received from owning, renting, leasing, or operating such machines.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a chartered city or to a chartered city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 817.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

This article does not repeal any act vesting municipal corporations with power to license for revenue purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

Any license issued to a business pursuant to this chapter shall be revoked for a violation of Section 24185 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to human cloning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 821, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

(a) A city shall not include in the definition of gross receipts, for purposes of any local tax or fee imposed by the city on a cannabis retailer licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000), the amount of any cannabis excise tax imposed under Section 34011.2 of, or any sales and use taxes imposed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of, or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(b) For purposes of this section, “city” includes a charter city and a city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   (SB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Licensing by Counties [16100. - 16106.]

16100.

(a) The board of supervisors may in the exercise of its police powers, and for the purpose of regulation, as herein provided, and not otherwise, license any kind of business not prohibited by law, transacted and carried on within the limits of its jurisdiction, including all shows, exhibitions, and lawful games, and may fix the rate of the license fee and provide for its collection by suit or otherwise.

(b) No license fee levied pursuant to subdivision (a) that is measured by the licensee’s income or gross receipts, whether levied by a charter or general law county, shall apply to any nonprofit organization that is exempted from taxes by Chapter 4 (commencing
 with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Subchapter F (commencing with Section 501) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or the successor of either, or to any minister, clergyman, Christian Science practitioner, rabbi, or priest of any religious organization that has been granted an exemption from federal income tax by the United States Commissioner of Internal Revenue as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or a successor to that section.

(c) Before a county issues a business license to a person to conduct business as a contractor, as defined by Section 7026, the county shall verify that the person is licensed by the Contractors State License Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 96.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16100.1.

(a) (1) A county that licenses businesses carried on within its jurisdiction shall accept a California driver’s license or identification number, an individual taxpayer identification number, or a municipal identification number in lieu of a social security number if the county otherwise requires a social security number for the issuance of a business license.

(2) A county that licenses a business carried on within its jurisdiction shall require the applicant to provide an address where the individual consents to receive service of process. An acceptable address for this purpose shall include a post office box or private mailbox that complies with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17538.5. This address shall be
 available for public inspection.

(3) Personal information collected for purposes of issuing a business license by a county shall be confidential, shall not be available to the public for inspection, and shall not be disclosed except as required to administer the licensure program or comply with a judicial warrant, subpoena, or court order.

(b) For purposes of this section, “personal information” means all of the following:

(1) An applicant’s residential address if the applicant provides a different address pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) A California driver’s license or identification number, an individual taxpayer identification number, a municipal identification number, and a social security number.

(3) Income and tax information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 388, Sec. 3.   (AB 2184)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16100.3.

(a) When applying to a county for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, or business renewal thereof, a person who conducts a business operation that is a regulated industry, as defined in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, shall demonstrate enrollment with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit program by providing all of the following information, under penalty of perjury, on the initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, or renewal thereof, application:

(1) The name and location of facilities operated by the person who conducts that business.

(2) All primary Standard Industrial Classification Codes, as defined in Section 25244.14 of the Health and Safety Code, for the business.

(3) Any of the following for each facility operated by the person of that business:

(A) The stormwater permit number, known as the Waste Discharger Identification number (WDID), issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(B) The WDID application number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(C) The “notice of nonapplicability” (NONA) identification number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(D) The “no exposure certification” (NEC) identification number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b) Prior to the issuance or renewal of the business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, the county shall determine whether any of the primary Standard Industrial Classification Codes are applicable to a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding
 Construction Activities, as referenced in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, and if applicable, the county shall confirm that the WDID, WDID application number, NONA, or NEC corresponds to the business requesting the initial business license or business license renewal. To determine whether any of the primary Standard Industrial Classification Codes are applicable to a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding Construction Activities, as referenced in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, the county may use information provided by the State Water Resources Control Board, including information posted pursuant to Section 13383.10 of the Water Code for these purposes. To confirm the WDID, WDID application number, NONA, or NEC, the county shall only need to keep record of the applicable documentation.

(c) The county shall transfer compliance information received in subdivision (a) to the State Water Resources Control Board as requested by the board. The county shall make the identification number provided in the applicable documentation available to the public upon request in a manner consistent with the procedures of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) For business license, equivalent instrument, or permit renewals, a county may develop a provisional license procedure that provides businesses three months to comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) “County” includes a charter county and a charter city and county.

(f) This section shall apply to applications for initial business
 licenses, equivalent instruments, or permits, and renewals thereof, submitted on and after January 1, 2020.

(g) This section shall not apply to a county that does not issue or renew, or have an application process for issuing or renewing, business licenses, equivalent instruments, or permits that include a business license.

(h) This section shall not be construed to impose any additional liability on a county under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit program for nonenrollment under a General Permit for Storm Water Discharges Associated with Industrial Activities Excluding Construction Activities by a person who conducts a business operation that is a regulated industry, as defined in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code. 

(i) For purposes of this section, a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit includes a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit issued solely for the purpose of raising revenue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16100.5.

Notwithstanding Section 16100, no county or city and county shall require a regulatory license or impose a regulatory license fee with respect to cafe musicians.

“Cafe musician,” for the purposes of this section, means any person playing a musical instrument in any place or establishment where food or alcoholic beverages are sold, offered for sale or given away, who is an employee, or independent contractor, of such place or establishment. “Cafe musician” does not include an owner, manager, or operator of such place or establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

16100.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 37101 of the Government Code, Section 7284 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Section 16000 of this code, no county or city and county shall require a regulatory license or impose a regulatory license fee with respect to the solicitation of donations for the support of veterans by federally chartered veterans’ organizations specified in Title 36 of the United States Code.

(b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit licensing and regulation of business-related activities, such as those involving the sale or exchange of goods or services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

The boards of supervisors in their respective counties may for the purpose of revenue license individuals acting as hawkers, itinerant peddlers or itinerant vendors, other than merchants having a fixed place of business in the county, their employees, and farmers selling farm products produced by them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

Every soldier, sailor or marine of the United States who has received an honorable discharge or a release from active duty under honorable conditions from such service may hawk, peddle and vend any goods, wares or merchandise owned by him, except spirituous, malt, vinous or other intoxicating liquor, without payment of any license, tax or fee whatsoever, whether municipal, county or State, and the board of supervisors shall issue to such soldier, sailor or marine, without cost, a license therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

No license fee may be collected from, nor any penalty for the nonpayment thereof enforced against, any commercial traveler whose business is limited to goods, wares and merchandise sold or dealt in at wholesale in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

No license requiring a fee greater than 3 cents ($0.03) per head shall be imposed by the board of supervisors of any county on the business of raising, grazing, herding or pasturing sheep, nor shall any such license tax be applicable to or on account of lambs under eight months old.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

16105.

Any license issued to a business pursuant to this chapter shall be revoked for violation of Section 24185 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to human cloning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 821, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16106.

A county shall not include in the definition of gross receipts, for purposes of any local tax or fee imposed by the county on a cannabis retailer licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000), the amount of any cannabis excise tax imposed under Section 34011.2 of, or any sales and use taxes imposed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of, or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 874, Sec. 2.   (SB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Business License Taxation [16110. - 16112.]

16110.

No city, county, or city and county which levies a business license tax calculated on a basis of gross receipts pursuant to Section 16000 or 16100 or Section 37101 of the Government Code, as the case may be, or pursuant to any other provision of law, shall include the amount of gross receipts or the cost of the business license tax on the business license tax receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16111.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Business license tax receipt” means the receipt or certificate required to be posted or displayed as evidence of a business’s payment of the tax.

(b) “City” includes a charter city.

(c) “County” includes a charter county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16112.

The Legislature finds and declares that protecting the privacy of a business’s tax payments and gross receipts is a matter of statewide interest and concern.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Licensing [16200. - 16240.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [16200. - 16205.]

16200.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of the terms they define in the subsequent sections of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16201.

“Fee” includes every tax, fee, penalty and other monetary exaction, and interest and costs in connection therewith, imposed or collected in connection with or as a prerequisite to or condition for the issuance, renewal or continued validity of any license, certificate or registration required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16202.

“Tax” includes every tax, fee, penalty and other monetary exaction, and interest and costs in connection therewith, imposed or collected for revenue for public purposes generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16203.

“Charge” includes every tax, fee, penalty and other monetary exaction, and interest and costs in connection therewith, imposed or collected for regulatory purposes or for some particular public purpose or purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16204.

“Officer” includes director, chief, commissioner, chairman, department, division, bureau, commission, board and any other person, officer or employee, and any agency, of or in the Government of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16205.

“Taxpayer” includes every individual, person, firm, partnership, joint adventure, association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate and artificial legal entity subject to or liable for any fee, tax or charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Actions [16220. - 16224.]

16220.

The remedy provided by this chapter for the collection of any fee, tax and charge is cumulative. No action taken under this chapter constitutes an election to pursue the remedy provided by it to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16221.

Every officer by or for whom any fee, tax or charge imposed by the statutes of this State is collected may bring a suit in the name of the people of this State against any taxpayer who fails, neglects or refuses to pay any sums due, owing and unpaid by the taxpayer upon the fee, tax or charge.

This section does not of itself authorize a suit for recovery of a judgment for a tax on real estate which is a lien thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16222.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to the service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials and appeals are applicable to actions under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16223.

Upon application and without bond or affidavit, every officer suing under this chapter is entitled to all or any of provisional remedies provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

16224.

All sums collected in suits under this chapter shall be reported to the Controller and deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund in which would be deposited the fee, tax or charge for which the suit was brought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Penalties [16240. - 16240.]

16240.

Every person who practices, offers to practice, or advertises any business, trade, profession, occupation, or calling, or who uses any title, sign, initials, card, or device to indicate that he or she is qualified to practice any business, trade, profession, occupation, or calling for which a license, registration, or certificate is required by any law of this state, without holding a current and valid license, registration, or certificate as prescribed by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1207, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Employment Activities [16300. - 16300.]

16300.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 7284) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 37100) of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code, no city, including a charter city, city and county, or county may require an employee to obtain a business license or home business occupation permit for, or impose a business tax or registration fee based on income earned for services performed for an employer by the employee in an employment relationship as determined by reference to the common law factors reflected in rulings or guidelines used by either the Internal Revenue Service or the Franchise Tax Board. When there is a dispute between a city, city and county, or county and a taxpayer, the manner in which a taxpayer reports or reported income to the Franchise Tax Board or the Internal Revenue Service shall create a presumption regarding whether the taxpayer performed services for an employer as an employee, or operated a business entity. For purposes of this section, “income” includes income paid currently or deferred and income that is fixed or contingent.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit the authority of a city, city and county, or county to adopt and enforce zoning, health and safety ordinances, or regulations that define and limit activities that are permissible within its jurisdiction for the purposes of health, safety, welfare, and the provisions of applicable noise ordinances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Notice to Licensees [16545. - 16545.]

16545.

Every state agency which licenses any kind of business transacted or carried on within their respective jurisdictions shall require applications filed to designate the name of the applicant’s workmen’s compensation insurance carrier, if any. This section does not apply to licensing under the Outdoor Advertising Act. The license application form shall contain a statement substantially as follows: “I am aware of the provisions of Section 3700 of the Labor Code which requires every employer to be insured against liability for workmen’s compensation.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1423.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Transportation Network Company Drivers: Business Licenses [16550. - 16550.2.]

16550.

It is the intent of the Legislature to limit any requirement for a business license imposed by a local jurisdiction on a participating driver for a transportation network company to a single business license, regardless of the number of local jurisdictions in which the participating driver operates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.   (SB 182)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16550.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Business license” includes any license, certificate, fee, or equivalent payment that is required or collected by a local jurisdiction annually, or on some other fixed cycle, as a condition of providing prearranged transportation services in the local jurisdiction.

(b) “Driver” has the same meaning as the definition of driver provided in subdivision (a) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county, including charter
 cities.

(d) “Personally identifiable information” means individually identifiable information about an individual driver collected by the local jurisdiction from that individual, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A first and last name.

(2) A residential address, including a street and city name.

(3) An email address.

(4) A telephone number.

(5) A social security number.

(6) Driver income or tax information.

(e) “Transportation network company” has the same meaning as the definition of transportation network company provided in subdivision (c) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.   (SB 182)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16550.2.

(a) Any local jurisdiction that requires a driver to obtain a business license to operate as a driver for a transportation network company may only require that driver to obtain a single business license, regardless of the number of local jurisdictions in which the driver operates.

(b) The driver shall obtain a business license in the local jurisdiction in which the driver is domiciled. If the local jurisdiction does not require a business license to operate as a driver for a transportation network company, the driver shall not be required to obtain a business license for any other jurisdiction.

(c) A
 local jurisdiction shall not require a driver to obtain a business license if either of the following applies:

(1) The driver is compliant with subdivision (b).

(2) The driver has not operated as a driver for more than 30 days in the preceding fiscal year.

(d) Each transportation network company shall notify its drivers of the obligations set forth in this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a business license issued to a
 driver by a local jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter shall be valid for the period of time determined by the local jurisdiction by law or regulation, except that the local jurisdiction shall not require a driver to obtain a business license that applies for a period before January 1, 2018, or that imposes any penalty or fee on a driver related to the driver’s failure to obtain a business license for providing transportation network services for a period before January 1, 2018.

(f) Personally identifiable information submitted to a local jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter shall not be disclosed on a publicly accessible Internet Web site.

(g) This chapter does not preclude the sharing of business license data among local jurisdictions.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that allowing the free operation of drivers for transportation network companies across local jurisdictions is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in subdivision (a) of Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.   (SB 182)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PRESERVATION AND REGULATION OF COMPETITION [16600. - 17365.]



  CHAPTER 1. Contracts in Restraint of Trade [16600. - 16608.]

16600.

(a) Except as provided in this chapter, every contract by which anyone is restrained from engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business of any kind is to that extent void.

(b) (1) This section shall be read broadly, in accordance with Edwards v. Arthur Andersen LLP (2008) 44 Cal.4th 937, to void the application of any noncompete agreement in an employment context, or any noncompete clause in an employment contract, no matter how narrowly tailored, that does not satisfy an exception in this chapter.

(2) This subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory
 of, existing law.

(c) This section shall not be limited to contracts where the person being restrained from engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business is a party to the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 828, Sec. 1.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16600.1.

(a) It shall be unlawful to include a noncompete clause in an employment contract, or to require an employee to enter a noncompete agreement, that does not satisfy an exception in this chapter.

(b) (1) For current employees, and for former employees who were employed after January 1, 2022, whose contracts include a noncompete clause, or who were required to enter a noncompete agreement, that does not satisfy an exception to this chapter, the employer shall, by February 14, 2024, notify the employee that the noncompete clause or noncompete agreement is void.

(2) Notice made under this
 subdivision shall be in the form of a written individualized communication to the employee or former employee, and shall be delivered to the last known address and the email address of the employee or former employee.

(c) A violation of this section constitutes an act of unfair competition within the meaning of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 828, Sec. 2.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16600.5.

(a) Any contract that is void under this chapter is unenforceable regardless of where and when the contract was signed.

(b) An employer or former employer shall not attempt to enforce a contract that is void under this chapter regardless of whether the contract was signed and the employment was maintained outside of California.

(c) An employer shall not enter into a contract with an employee or prospective employee that includes a provision that is void under this chapter.

(d) An employer that enters into a contract that is void under this
 chapter or attempts to enforce a contract that is void under this chapter commits a civil violation.

(e) (1) An employee, former employee, or prospective employee may bring a private action to enforce this chapter for injunctive relief or the recovery of actual damages, or both.

(2) In addition to the remedies
 described in paragraph (1), a prevailing employee, former employee, or prospective employee in an action based on a violation of this chapter shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
